Utah statutes.
77-17-12.   Defendant on bail appearing for trial may be committed.

When a defendant who has given bail appears for trial, the court may, at any time after his appearance for trial, order him to be committed to the custody of the proper officer to await the judgment or further order of the court.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

